apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="ল/াগ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগছিলাম</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগছিল</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েগে</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pcnd" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েগেছেন</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগবে</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগল</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েগেছিল</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ppst" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগবেন</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগবে</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগবেন</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েগেছে</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগবে</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগলি</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগছে</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগ</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগতে থাকব</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েগেছিল</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগবেন</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগছিল</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগব</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েগেছিল</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগতে</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="inf" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েগেছিলাম</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগলে</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগলে</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগিস</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগি</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগছি</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগছিলি</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগলেন</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগবে</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগা</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ger" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগতেন</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="hbtl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগ</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগিস</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগত</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="hbtl" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগতে থাকবে</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগছিস</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগ</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েগেছিলেন</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগছিলে</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগছ</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াগতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েগেছিস</l>
          <r>াগ<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />

    <e lm="লাগ">
      <i>ল</i>
      <par n="ল/াগ__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="জাগ">
      <i>জ</i>
      <par n="ল/াগ__vblex" />
    </e>
